Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB446.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. The act of July 19, 1979 (P.L.130, No.48), known as the Health Care Facilities Act, is amended by adding a section to read:Section 809.3. Medication offered to patient.(a) General rule.--For a facility-provided medication administered to a patient during an episode of care in a health care HOSPITAL OR AMBULATORY SURGICAL facility, any UNUSED portion of the medication billed to the patient that is unused shall be offered to the patient at no additional charge upon <--<--<--123456789101112131415161718192021 discharge when the medication may be required for continuing treatment.(b) Facility option.--For a facility-provided medication administered to a patient during an episode of care in a health care facility, any portion of the medication that is unused that would otherwise be wasted shall be offered to the patient at no additional charge upon discharge when the medication is required for continuing treatment.(c) Labeling.--A facility-provided medication shall be labeled consistent with labeling requirements under the act of September 27, 1961 (P.L.1700, No.699), known as the "Pharmacy Act."(d) Counseling waived.--If a facility-provided medication is used in an operating room or emergency department setting, the prescriber shall counsel the patient on the medication's proper use and administration and the requirements of pharmacist counseling shall be waived. OR THAT WOULD OTHERWISE BE DISCARDED AFTER PARTIAL USE DURING THE EPISODE OF CARE SHALL BE OFFERED TO THE PATIENT AT NO ADDITIONAL CHARGE UPON DISCHARGE IF:(1) OFFERING THE MEDICATION TO THE PATIENT MEETS THE PRESCRIBER'S STANDARD OF CARE; AND(2) THE PRESCRIBER DETERMINES THAT THE FACILITY-PROVIDED MEDICATION IS REQUIRED FOR CONTINUING TREATMENT.(B) DUTIES WHEN DISPENSING MEDICATION.--NOTWITHSTANDING ANY OTHER PROVISION OF LAW, WHEN A FACILITY-PROVIDED MEDICATION IS DISPENSED IN ACCORDANCE WITH SUBSECTION (A), THE FOLLOWING APPLY:(1) A FACILITY-PROVIDED MEDICATION THAT CONTAINS A LABEL WITH THE SAME INFORMATION USED DURING INSTITUTIONAL ADMINISTRATION AS REQUIRED UNDER 49 PA. CODE § 27.18(V) 20250HB0446PN2021 - 2 - <--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (RELATING TO STANDARDS OF PRACTICE) SHALL FULFILL THE LABELING REQUIREMENTS UNDER THE ACT OF SEPTEMBER 27, 1961 (P.L.1700, NO.699), KNOWN AS THE "PHARMACY ACT," THE ACT OF APRIL 14, 1972 (P.L.233, NO.64), KNOWN AS "THE CONTROLLED SUBSTANCE, DRUG, DEVICE AND COSMETIC ACT," OR REGULATIONS PROMULGATED BY THE STATE BOARD OF PHARMACY.(2) A PRESCRIBER MAY FULFILL THE PHARMACIST COUNSELING REQUIREMENTS UNDER 49 PA. CODE § 27.19(D) OR (E) (RELATING TO PROSPECTIVE DRUG REVIEW AND PATIENT COUNSELING) BY OFFERING TO COUNSEL OR BY COUNSELING A PATIENT OR CAREGIVER IN ACCORDANCE WITH THE REGULATION.(3) A HOSPITAL OR AMBULATORY SURGICAL FACILITY SHALL INCLUDE, IN ANY DISCHARGE INSTRUCTIONS, THE FOLLOWING:(I) WRITTEN INSTRUCTIONS FOR THE FACILITY-PROVIDED MEDICATION'S PROPER USE AND ADMINISTRATION, INCLUDING THE REMAINING NUMBER OF DOSES TO THE EXTENT QUANTIFIABLE OR CALCULABLE.(II) A PHONE NUMBER TO CONTACT THE PRESCRIBER OR PHARMACIST.(C) EXEMPTION FROM OUTPATIENT DISPENSING REQUIREMENTS.--A FACILITY-PROVIDED MEDICATION THAT IS OFFERED OR DISPENSED IN ACCORDANCE WITH THIS SECTION SHALL NOT BE CONSIDERED OUTPATIENT DISPENSING UNDER THE "PHARMACY ACT," "THE CONTROLLED SUBSTANCE, DRUG, DEVICE AND COSMETIC ACT" OR REGULATIONS PROMULGATED BY THE STATE BOARD OF PHARMACY.(D) LIABILITY PROTECTION.--A PRESCRIBER, PHARMACIST, HOSPITAL OR AMBULATORY SURGICAL FACILITY ACTING IN GOOD FAITH AND IN ACCORDANCE WITH THIS SECTION SHALL NOT BE HELD CIVILLY OR ADMINISTRATIVELY LIABLE FOR ANY INJURY OR HARM RESULTING FROM A PATIENT'S MISUSE, NONADHERENCE OR FAILURE TO FOLLOW DISCHARGE 20250HB0446PN2021 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 INSTRUCTIONS RELATED TO A FACILITY-PROVIDED MEDICATION, UNLESS THE INJURY OR HARM RESULTS FROM GROSS NEGLIGENCE OR WILLFUL MISCONDUCT.(e) Definitions.--As used in this section, the following words and phrases shall have the meanings given to them in this subsection unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Facility-provided medication." A topical antibiotic, anti- inflammatory, dilation or glaucoma drop or ointment or nasal spray that a health care facility employee has on standby or that is retrieved from a dispensing system for a specified patient for use during a procedure or visit. A MULTI-USE DRUG PRODUCT INTENDED FOR A SINGLE PATIENT THAT IS CLINICALLY APPROPRIATE FOR THE ACUTE CONDITION CAUSING THE HOSPITAL OR AMBULATORY SURGICAL FACILITY EPISODE OF CARE AND FOR CONTINUED USE POST-DISCHARGE, SUCH AS EYE DROPS, EAR DROPS, A TOPICAL CREAM OR AN EMERGENCY INHALER. THE TERM DOES NOT INCLUDE A PRODUCT THAT IS USED INTRAVENOUSLY OR IS A CONTROLLED SUBSTANCE."Prescriber." A person that is licensed, registered or otherwise authorized to distribute, dispense or AND administer a controlled substance, other drug or device in the course of professional practice or research in this Commonwealth. The term does not include a veterinarian.Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB0446PN2021 - 4 - <--<--<--1234567891011121314151617181920212223